Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2005
Annual net metering report; contents.

Beginning March 1, 2010, and on each March 1 thereafter, each local distribution utility shall produce and publish on its web site, or if no web site is available, in its main office, and provide to the Nebraska Power Review Board an annual net metering report that shall include the following information:

(1) The total number of qualified facilities;

(2) The total estimated rated generating capacity of qualified facilities;

(3) The total estimated net kilowatt-hours received from customer-generators; and

(4) The total estimated amount of energy produced by the customer-generators.

Laws 2009, LB436, § 5.